Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6655YH (2) 91 as/js H.F. 2194 Section 1. Section 80B.6, subsection 1, paragraphs a, h, and 1 i, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 2 a. Three residents One resident of the state who has not 3 been employed as a certified law enforcement officer . 4 h. A police officer who is a member of a police department 5 of a city with a population of fifty twenty-five thousand 6 persons or more. 7 i. A police officer who is a member of a police department 8 of a city with a population of less than fifty five thousand 9 persons. 10 Sec. 2. Section 80B.6, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 11 by adding the following new paragraphs: 12 NEW PARAGRAPH . l. A member of the Iowa fraternal order of 13 police. 14 NEW PARAGRAPH . m. A police officer employed by a regents 15 institution. 16 Sec. 3. Section 80B.6, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 17 following new subsection: 18 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. No person shall be eligible to serve 19 on the Iowa law enforcement academy council for more than two 20 terms in succession. 21